Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1220
Fees; deposited with State Treasurer; placed in State Game Fund.

The secretary of the commission shall deposit daily with the State Treasurer all fees received pursuant to section 37-1219 and shall take the receipt of the State Treasurer therefor. The State Treasurer shall place all of the fees so deposited in the State Game Fund.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 20;

Laws 2015, LB142, § 6.